Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 44

Mechanics' and Materialmen's Liens

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Preambles.

Acts 1969, No. 112 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, recent court decisions have disclosed that certain contractors performing clearing, excavating, or ditching services in the process of constructing home sites were not heretofore granted the same lien as mechanics, materialmen, builders, and laborers; and

“Whereas, the contractors performing these vital and indispensable services should receive the same protection as others herein named;

“Now, therefore….”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 26: effective on passage.

Acts 1899, No. 182, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1913, No. 253, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1923, No. 563, § 2: approved Mar. 22, 1923. Emergency clause provided: “That this act being necessary for the public peace, health and safety, an emergency is hereby declared and this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.”

Acts 1945, No. 55, § 3: Feb. 16, 1945. Emergency clause provided: “All laws and parts of laws in conflict herewith are hereby repealed, and because of the confusion and uncertainty existing in the various counties throughout the State under the present laws relative to the legal fees entitled to be charged by the Circuit and Chancery Clerks and Recorders in this State for the services they render, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1963, No. 66, § 3: Feb. 15, 1963. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined that by reason of the uncertain condition of the law relating to mechanic's and materialman's liens and the lack of proper penalties, owners of property in many instances are being defrauded of funds paid to contractors who fail to discharge existing liens upon the property, and other owners are being subjected to unjust claims of liens, and by reason of such facts an emergency exists affecting the public peace, health, and safety, and this act shall therefore be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval by the governor.”

Acts 1963, No. 124, § 2: Feb. 28, 1963. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the fee presently provided for recorders for recording, indexing and cross-indexing instruments of writing is not adequate to compensate such recorders and in fact is working a severe hardship on the recorders in the various counties and that this act is immediately necessary to correct the situation. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in effect from the date of its passage and approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 112, § 2: Feb. 25, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the contractors performing these invaluable services are in need of the immediate protection which would by granted them under this Act, and that this Act is immediately necessary to extend the same degree of protection to all contractors for performance of their services. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public health, safety, and peace shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1977, No. 333, § 6: Mar. 1, 1977. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the establishment of uniform advance fees to be charged for causes of action by the clerks in the various circuit and chancery courts of this State is necessary to provide for the efficient operation of said offices and to minimize the necessity of maintaining separate accounts for various fees; that the fees charged by county recorders are not now adequate to reimburse the county for the service of recording instruments, and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to promote the efficient administration of justice in this State and to enable counties to recover reasonable fees for services rendered by recorders. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1979, No. 746, § 7: Oct. 1, 1979.

Acts 1983, No. 304, § 3: Mar. 2, 1983. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that contractors licensed under the Contractors' Licensing Law should not be required to comply with the notice provisions of Act 746 of 1979 to the extent of commercial and industrial construction; and that this Act is immediately necessary to exempt such persons from the provisions of Act 746. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

18-44-101. Liens on buildings, land, or boats.

(a)

Every contractor, subcontractor, or material supplier as defined in §18-44-107 who supplies labor, services, material, fixtures, engines, boilers, or machinery in the construction or repair of an improvement to real estate, or any boat or vessel of any kind, by virtue of a contract with the owner, proprietor, contractor, or subcontractor, or agent thereof, upon complying with the provisions of this subchapter, shall have, to secure payment, a lien upon the improvement and on up to one (1) acre of land upon which the improvement is situated, or to the extent of any number of acres of land upon which work has been done or improvements erected or repaired.

(b)

If the improvement is to any boat or vessel, then the lien shall be upon the boat or vessel to secure the payment for labor done or materials, fixtures, engines, boilers, or machinery furnished.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 1, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6906; Acts 1923, No. 563, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 8865; Acts 1969, No. 112, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-601; Acts 1995, No. 1298, § 1.

Cross References.

Laborers' liens, §18-43-101 et seq.

Liens of artisans and repairmen, §18-45-101 et seq.

Liens of employers and employees under contract, §18-42-101.

18-44-102. Entire land subject to lien.

The entire land, to the extent stated in §18-44-101, upon which any building, erection, or other improvement is situated including that part of the land which is not covered with the building, erection, or other improvement as well as that part of the land which is covered with it, shall be subject to all liens created by this subchapter to the extent, and only to the extent, of all the right, title, and interest owned therein by the owner or proprietor of the building, erection, or other improvement for whose immediate use or benefit the labor was done or things were furnished.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 2, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6908; Pope's Dig., § 8867; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-604.

18-44-103. Improvements on leased land.

(a)

Every building or other improvement erected or materials furnished, according to the provisions of this subchapter, on leased lots or lands shall be held for the debt contracted for, or on account of it, and also the leasehold term for the lot and land on which it is erected.

(b)(1)

In case the lessee shall have forfeited his or her lease, the purchaser of the building and leasehold term, or so much of it as remains unexpired, under the provisions of this subchapter, shall be held to the assignee of the leasehold term and, as such, shall be entitled to pay to the lessor all arrears of rent or other money, interest, and costs due under the lease, unless the lessor shall have regained possession of the leasehold land, or obtained judgment for the possession of it on account of the noncompliance by the lessee with the terms of the lease, prior to the commencement of the improvements thereon.

(2)

In this case the purchaser of the improvements under this subchapter shall have the right only to remove the improvements within sixty (60) days after he or she shall purchase them, and the owner of the ground shall receive the rent due him or her payable out of the proceeds of the sale, according to the terms of the lease, down to the time of removing the building.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 4, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6910; Pope's Dig., § 8869; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-606.

18-44-104. Liens for drain pipe or tile.

(a)

Every contractor, subcontractor, or material supplier who shall furnish to any landowner any soil or drain pipe or tile for drainage of his or her land, or who shall put in soil or drain pipe or tile for any land, shall have a lien for each tract of forty (40) acres or less of the real estate upon which the soil or drain pipe or tile is placed for the payment of the lien.

(b)(1)

The lien for the soil or drain pipe or tile shall attach to the real estate and all improvements thereon in preference to any subsequent liens, encumbrance, or mortgage executed upon the land after the purchase of the soil or drain pipe or tile.

(2)

The lien shall be:

(A)

Subject to the notice requirements of §§18-44-114 and18-44-115;

(B)

Filed under §18-44-117; and

(C)

Enforced under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1913, No. 253, §§ 1, 2; C. & M. Dig., § 6924; Pope's Dig., § 8886; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-602, 51-603; Acts 2009, No. 454, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment, in (a), deleted (a)(2), which read: “The lien shall extend for a period of two (2) years,” redesignated the remaining text accordingly, and substituted “contractor, subcontractor, or material supplier” for “manufacturer or contractor”; rewrote (b)(2), which read: “The lien shall be enforced in the same manner as a mechanic's or contractor's liens”; and made related and minor stylistic changes.

18-44-105. Lien of architect, engineer, surveyor, appraiser, landscaper, abstractor, or title insurance agent.

(a)

Every architect, engineer, surveyor, appraiser, landscaper, abstractor, or title insurance agent who shall do or perform any architectural, engineering, surveying, appraisal, landscaping, or abstracting services upon any land, or who shall issue a title insurance policy or provide landscaping supplies upon any land, building, erection, or improvement upon land, under or by virtue of any written agreement for the performance of the work with the owner thereof, or his or her agent, shall have a lien upon the land, building, erection, or improvement upon land to the extent of the agreed contract price or a reasonable price for those services.

(b)(1)

However, the lien does not attach to the land, building, erection, or improvement upon land unless and until the lien is duly filed of record with the circuit clerk and recorder in the county in which the land, building, erection, or improvement is located.

(2)

The lien shall be:

(A)

Subject to the notice requirements of §§18-44-114 and18-44-115;

(B)

Filed under §18-44-117; and

(C)

Enforced under this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 291, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-642; Acts 2009, No. 454, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section heading;
in (a), substituted “architect, engineer, surveyor, appraiser, landscaper, abstractor, or title insurance agent who shall do or perform any architectural ... landscaping supplies” for “engineer or surveyor who shall do or perform any engineering or surveying work,” and substituted “written agreement for the performance of work” for “contract or agreement”; and rewrote (b)(2), which read: “This recorded lien will be enforced in the same manner as a mechanic's or contractor's lien.”

18-44-106. “Owner” defined.

As used in this subchapter, the “owner” of property shall include the owner of the legal title to property and any person, including all cestui que trust, for whose immediate use, enjoyment, or benefit a building, erection, or other improvement is made.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 22, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6933; Pope's Dig., § 8895; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-623; Acts 2009, No. 454, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section heading; substituted “As used in this subchapter, the ‘owner’ of property shall include the owner of the legal title to property and any” for “Every,” deleted “shall be concluded by the words ‘owner or proprietor thereof’, under this subchapter” following “improvement is made,” and made related changes.

18-44-107. Subcontractors — Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

(1)

“Contractor” means any person who contracts orally or in writing directly with a person holding an interest in real estate, or such person's agent, for the construction of any improvement to or repair of real estate;

(2)

“Material supplier” means any person who supplies materials, goods, fixtures, or any other tangible item to the contractor or a subcontractor, or an individual having direct contractual privity with such persons;

(3)

“Person” includes an individual, a partnership, a corporation, a limited liability organization, a trust, or any other business entity recognized by law; and

(4)

“Subcontractor” means any person who supplies labor or services pursuant to a contract with the contractor, or to a person in direct privity of contract with such person.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 24, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6935; Pope's Dig., § 8897; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-625; Acts 1995, No. 1298, § 2.

18-44-108. Refusal to list parties doing work or furnishing materials.

(a)

The owner or proprietor, material supplier, subcontractor, or anyone interested as mortgagee or trustee in the real estate upon which improvements are made under this subchapter may apply at any time to the contractor or subcontractor for the following:

(1)

A list of all parties doing work or furnishing material for a building and the amount due to each of the parties; and

(2)

Certification that the owner or agent has received the preliminary notice specified under §18-44-115(a), if applicable.

(b)

Any contractor or subcontractor who, upon request, refuses or fails within five (5) business days to give a correct list of the parties furnishing material or doing labor on the building and the amount due to each or who falsely certifies that an owner or agent has received the preliminary notice specified under §18-44-115 shall be:

(1)

Guilty of a violation and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500); and

(2)(A)

Subject to suit by an aggrieved party in the circuit court where the property is located to enforce subsection (a) of this section including without limitation by the contempt powers of the circuit court.

(B)

The prevailing party in an action under this subdivision (b)(2) shall receive a judgment for any damages proximately caused by the violation of this subsection, the costs of the action, and a reasonable attorney's fee.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 10, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6921; Pope's Dig., § 8880; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-612; Acts 1995, No. 1298, § 3; 2005, No. 1994, § 96; 2009, No. 454, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “violation and upon conviction” for “misdemeanor and” in (b).

The 2009 amendment substituted “§18-44-115(a), if applicable” for “§18-44-115” in (a)(2); and in (b), inserted (b)(2), redesignated the remaining text accordingly, and made related changes.

18-44-109. Unlawful to use materials other than as designated.

Any contractor or subcontractor who shall purchase materials on credit and represent at the time of purchase that they are to be used in a designated building or other improvement and shall thereafter use, or cause to be used, the materials in the construction of any building or improvement other than that designated without the written consent of the person from whom the materials were purchased with intent to defraud that person shall be guilty of a violation if the materials were valued at one thousand dollars ($1,000) or more and upon conviction shall be punished by a fine not exceeding two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 10, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6921; Pope's Dig., § 8880; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-612; Acts 1995, No. 1298, § 4; 2005, No. 1994, § 97.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” and inserted “upon conviction.”

18-44-110. Preference over prior liens — Exception.

(a)(1)

The liens for labor performed or material or fixtures furnished, as provided for in this subchapter, shall have equal priority toward each other without regard to the date of filing the account or lien or the date when the particular labor or material was performed or furnished. All such liens shall date from the time that the construction or repair first commenced.

(2)

Construction or repair commences when there is a visible manifestation of activity on real estate that would lead a reasonable person to believe that construction or repair of an improvement to the real estate has begun or will soon begin, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A)

Delivery of a significant amount of lumber, bricks, pipe, tile, or other building material to the site;

(B)

Grading or excavating the site;

(C)

Laying out lines or grade stakes; or

(D)

Demolition in an existing structure.

(3)

In all cases in which a sale shall be ordered and the property sold, and the proceeds arising from the sale are not sufficient to discharge in full all the liens against the property without reference to the date of filing the account or lien, the proceeds shall be paid pro rata on the respective liens.

(b)(1)(A)

The liens for labor performed or materials or fixtures furnished, as provided for in this subchapter, shall attach to the improvement on which the labor was performed or the materials or fixtures were furnished in preference to any encumbrance existing on the real estate prior to the commencement of construction or repair of the improvement.

(B)

In all cases in which the prior encumbrance was given for the purpose of funding construction or repair of the improvement, that lien shall have priority over all liens given by this subchapter.

(2)

The liens, as provided for in this subchapter, shall be enforced by foreclosure, as further provided for in this subchapter, and the property ordered sold subject to the lien of the prior encumbrance on the real estate.

(c)

The lien for labor performed and materials or fixtures furnished, as provided for in this subchapter, shall have priority over all other encumbrances that attach to the real estate or improvements thereon subsequent to commencement of construction or repair.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 3, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6909; Pope's Dig., § 8868; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-605; Acts 1995, No. 1298, § 5.

18-44-111, 18-44-112. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning preferences over subsequent encumbrances and the equality of liens, were repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1298, § 6. The sections were derived from the following sources:

18-44-111. Acts 1895, No. 146, § 5, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6911; Pope's Dig., § 8870; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-607.

18-44-112. Acts 1895, No. 146, § 9, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6920; Pope's Dig., § 8879; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-611.

18-44-113. Assignment of liens.

(a)

The lien given in this subchapter shall be transferable and assignable, but it shall not be enforced against the owner of the ground or buildings unless the owner of the ground or buildings shall have actual notice of the assignment or notice under subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

The owner of the ground or buildings shall be considered to have actual notice if within thirty (30) days of the assignment a copy of the assignment is:

(1)

Hand delivered to the owner of the ground or buildings;

(2)

Mailed to the last known address of the owner of the ground or buildings and verified by a:

(A)

Return receipt signed by the addressee or the agent of the addressee; or

(B)

Returned envelope, postal document, or affidavit by a postal employee reciting or showing refusal of the notice by the addressee or that the item was unclaimed; or

(3)

Delivered by any means that provides written, third-party verification of delivery at any place that the owner of the ground or buildings maintains an office, conducts business, or resides.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 25, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6907, 6936; Pope's Dig., §§ 8866, 8898; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-626; Acts 2009, No. 454, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment added (b) and redesignated the remaining text accordingly; in (a), deleted “or proprietor” following “owner” twice, and substituted “or notice under subsection (b) of this section” for “so as to protect himself or herself”; and made a stylistic change.

Cross References.

Rights under assigned contracts, §4-58-107.

Parties.

The rights of the lienor in a claim for a mechanic's lien may be assigned and the original claimant is not a necessary party to the action. E.O. Barnett Bros. v. Wright, 116 Ark. 44, 172 S.W. 254 (1914).

18-44-114. Notice and service generally.

(a)

Every person who may wish to avail himself or herself of the benefit of the provisions of this subchapter shall give ten (10) days' notice before the filing of the lien, as required in §18-44-117(a), to the owner of a building or improvement that he or she holds a claim against the building or improvement, setting forth the amount and from whom it is due.

(b)(1)

The notice may be served by any:

(A)

Officer authorized by law to serve process in a civil action;

(B)

Person who would be a competent witness;

(C)

Form of mail addressed to the person to be served, with a return receipt requested and delivery restricted to the addressee or the agent of the addressee; or

(D)

Means that provides written, third-party verification of delivery at any place where the owner of the building or improvement maintains an office, conducts business, or resides.

(2)(A)(i)

When served by an officer, his or her official return endorsed on the notice shall be proof of the service.

(ii)

When served by any other person, the fact of the service shall be verified by affidavit of the person serving the notice.

(B)(i)

When served by mail, the service shall be:

(a)

Complete when mailed; and

(b)

Verified by a return receipt signed by the addressee or the agent of the addressee, or a returned envelope, postal document, or affidavit by a postal employee reciting or showing refusal of the notice by the addressee or that the item was unclaimed.

(ii)

If delivery of the mailed notice is refused by the addressee or the item is unclaimed:

(a)

The lien claimant shall immediately send the owner of the building or improvement a copy of the notice by first class mail and may proceed to file his or her lien; and

(b)

The unopened original of the item marked unclaimed or refused by the United States Postal Service shall be accepted as proof of service as of the postmarked date of the item.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 6, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6917; Pope's Dig., § 8876; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-608; Acts 1991, No. 588, § 1; 1999, No. 1466, § 1; 2005, No. 2287, § 5; 2009, No. 454, § 3.

Amendments.

The 1999 amendment added (a)(1)(B) and (a)(2); and made stylistic changes.

The 2005 amendment redesignated former (a)(1)(A) as present (a); deleted “except the original contractor” following “Every person” in present (a); and deleted former (a)(1)(B) and (a)(2).

The 2009 amendment substituted “owner of a building or improvement” for “owner, owners, or agent, or either of them” in (a); in (b), inserted (b)(1)(D), (b)(2)(B)(i)(a), and (b)(2)(B)(ii)(b), redesignated subdivisions accordingly, inserted “or that the item was unclaimed” in (b)(2)(B)(i)(b), inserted “or the item is unclaimed” in (b)(2)(B)(ii), and rewrote (b)(2)(B)(ii)(a); and made related and minor stylistic changes.

18-44-115. Notice to owner by contractor — Definitions.

(a)(1)

No lien upon residential real estate containing four (4) or fewer units may be acquired by virtue of this subchapter unless the owner of the residential real estate, the owner's authorized agent, or the owner's registered agent has received, by personal delivery or by certified mail, a copy of the notice set out in this subsection.

(2)

The notice required by this subsection shall not require the signature of the owner of the residential real estate, the owner's authorized agent, or the owner's registered agent in an instance when the notice is delivered by certified mail.

(3)

It shall be the duty of the residential contractor to give the owner, the owner's authorized agent, or the owner's registered agent the notice set out in this subsection on behalf of all potential lien claimants before the commencement of work.

(4)

If a residential contractor fails to give the notice required under this subsection, then the residential contractor is barred from bringing an action either at law or in equity, including without limitation quantum meruit, to enforce any provision of a residential contract.

(5)(A)

Any potential lien claimant may also give notice.

(B)(i)

If before commencing work or supplying goods a subcontractor, material supplier, laborer, or other lien claimant gives notice under this section, the notice shall be effective for all subcontractors, material suppliers, laborers, and other lien claimants not withstanding that the notice was given after the project commences as defined under §18-44-110(a)(2).

(ii)

If the notice relied upon by a lien claimant to establish a lien under this subchapter is given by another lien claimant under subdivision (a)(5)(B)(i) of this section after the project commences, the lien of the lien claimant shall secure only the labor, material, and services supplied after the effective date of the notice under subdivision (a)(5)(B)(i) of this section.

(C)

However, no lien may be claimed by any subcontractor, laborer, material supplier, or other lien claimant unless the owner of the residential real estate, the owner's authorized agent, or the owner's registered agent has received at least one (1) copy of the notice, which need not have been given by the particular lien claimant.

(6)

A residential contractor who fails to give the notice required by this subsection is guilty of a violation pursuant to §5-1-108 and upon pleading guilty or nolo contendere to or being found guilty of failing to give the notice required by this subsection shall be punished by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(7)

The notice set forth in this subsection may be incorporated into the contract or affixed to the contract and shall be conspicuous, set out in boldface type, worded exactly as stated in all capital letters, and shall read as follows:

“IMPORTANT NOTICE TO OWNER I UNDERSTAND THAT EACH CONTRACTOR, SUBCONTRACTOR, LABORER, SUPPLIER, ARCHITECT, ENGINEER, SURVEYOR, APPRAISER, LANDSCAPER, ABSTRACTOR, OR TITLE INSURANCE AGENT SUPPLYING LABOR, SERVICES, MATERIAL, OR FIXTURES IS ENTITLED TO A LIEN AGAINST THE PROPERTY IF NOT PAID IN FULL FOR THE LABOR, SERVICES, MATERIALS, OR FIXTURES USED TO IMPROVE, CONSTRUCT, OR INSURE OR EXAMINE TITLE TO THE PROPERTY EVEN THOUGH THE FULL CONTRACT PRICE MAY HAVE BEEN PAID TO THE CONTRACTOR. I REALIZE THAT THIS LIEN CAN BE ENFORCED BY THE SALE OF THE PROPERTY IF NECESSARY. I AM ALSO AWARE THAT PAYMENT MAY BE WITHHELD TO THE CONTRACTOR IN THE AMOUNT OF THE COST OF ANY SERVICES, FIXTURES, MATERIALS, OR LABOR NOT PAID FOR. I KNOW THAT IT IS ADVISABLE TO, AND I MAY, REQUIRE THE CONTRACTOR TO FURNISH TO ME A TRUE AND CORRECT FULL LIST OF ALL SUPPLIERS AND SERVICE PROVIDERS UNDER THE CONTRACT, AND I MAY CHECK WITH THEM TO DETERMINE IF ALL MATERIALS, LABOR, FIXTURES, AND SERVICES FURNISHED FOR THE PROPERTY HAVE BEEN PAID FOR. I MAY ALSO REQUIRE THE CONTRACTOR TO PRESENT LIEN WAIVERS BY ALL SUPPLIERS AND SERVICE PROVIDERS, STATING THAT THEY HAVE BEEN PAID IN FULL FOR SUPPLIES AND SERVICES PROVIDED UNDER THE CONTRACT, BEFORE I PAY THE CONTRACTOR IN FULL. IF A SUPPLIER OR OTHER SERVICE PROVIDER HAS NOT BEEN PAID, I MAY PAY THE SUPPLIER OR OTHER SERVICE PROVIDER AND CONTRACTOR WITH A CHECK MADE PAYABLE TO THEM JOINTLY. SIGNED: ADDRESS OF PROPERTY DATE: I HEREBY CERTIFY THAT THE SIGNATURE ABOVE IS THAT OF THE OWNER, REGISTERED AGENT OF THE OWNER, OR AUTHORIZED AGENT OF THE OWNER OF THE PROPERTY AT THE ADDRESS SET OUT ABOVE. CONTRACTOR”

Click to view form.

(8)(A)

If the residential contractor supplies a performance and payment bond or if the transaction is a direct sale to the property owner, the notice requirement of this subsection shall not apply, and the lien rights arising under this subchapter shall not be conditioned on the delivery and execution of the notice.

(B)

A sale shall be a direct sale only if:

(i)

The property owner orders materials or services from the lien claimant; and

(ii)

The lien claimant is not a home improvement contractor as defined by §17-25-502(1) or a residential building contractor as defined by §17-25-502(2).

(b)(1)(A)

The General Assembly finds that owners and developers of commercial real estate are generally knowledgeable and sophisticated in construction law, are aware that unpaid laborers, subcontractors, and material suppliers are entitled to assert liens against the real estate if unpaid, and know how to protect themselves against the imposition of mechanics' and material suppliers' liens.

(B)

The General Assembly further finds that consumers who construct or improve residential real estate containing four (4) or fewer units generally do not possess the same level of knowledge and awareness and need to be informed of their rights and responsibilities.

(2)

As used in this subsection:

(A)

“Commercial real estate” means:

(i)

Nonresidential real estate; and

(ii)

Residential real estate containing five (5) or more units; and

(B)

“Service provider” means an architect, an engineer, a surveyor, an appraiser, a landscaper, an abstractor, or a title insurance agent.

(3)

Because supplying the notice specified in subsection (a) of this section imposes a substantial burden on laborers, subcontractors, service providers, and material suppliers, the notice requirement mandated under subsection (a) of this section as a condition precedent to the imposition of a lien by a laborer, subcontractor, service provider, or material supplier shall apply only to construction of or improvement to residential real estate containing four (4) or fewer units.

(4)

No subcontractor, service provider, material supplier, or laborer shall be entitled to a lien upon commercial real estate unless the subcontractor, service provider, material supplier, or laborer notifies the owner of the commercial real estate being constructed or improved, the owner's authorized agent, or the owner's registered agent in writing that the subcontractor, service provider, material supplier, or laborer is currently entitled to payment but has not been paid.

(5)(A)

The notice shall be sent to the owner, the owner's authorized agent, or the owner's registered agent and to the contractor before seventy-five (75) days have elapsed from the time that the labor was supplied or the materials furnished.

(B)

The notice may be served by any:

(i)

Officer authorized by law to serve process in civil actions;

(ii)

Form of mail addressed to the person to be served with a return receipt requested and delivery restricted to the addressee or the agent of the addressee; or

(iii)

Means that provides written, third-party verification of delivery at any place where the owner, the owner's registered agent, or the owner's authorized agent maintains an office, conducts business, or resides.

(C)

When served by mail, the notice shall be complete when mailed.

(D)

If delivery of the mailed notice is refused by the addressee or the item is unclaimed:

(i)

The lien claimant shall immediately send the owner, the owner's authorized agent, or the owner's registered agent a copy of the notice by first class mail; and

(ii)

The unopened original of the item marked unclaimed or refused by the United States Postal Service shall be accepted as proof of service as of the postmarked date of the item.

(6)

The notice shall contain the following information:

(A)

A general description of the labor, service, or materials furnished, and the amount due and unpaid;

(B)

The name and address of the person furnishing the labor, service, or materials;

(C)

The name of the person who contracted for purchase of the labor, service, or materials;

(D)

A description of the job site sufficient for identification; and

(E)

The following statement set out in boldface type and all capital letters:

“NOTICE TO PROPERTY OWNER IF BILLS FOR LABOR, SERVICES, OR MATERIALS USED TO CONSTRUCT OR PROVIDE SERVICES FOR AN IMPROVEMENT TO REAL ESTATE ARE NOT PAID IN FULL, A CONSTRUCTION LIEN MAY BE PLACED AGAINST THE PROPERTY. THIS COULD RESULT IN THE LOSS, THROUGH FORECLOSURE PROCEEDINGS, OF ALL OR PART OF YOUR REAL ESTATE BEING IMPROVED. THIS MAY OCCUR EVEN THOUGH YOU HAVE PAID YOUR CONTRACTOR IN FULL. YOU MAY WISH TO PROTECT YOURSELF AGAINST THIS CONSEQUENCE BY PAYING THE ABOVE NAMED PROVIDER OF LABOR, SERVICES, OR MATERIALS DIRECTLY, OR MAKING YOUR CHECK PAYABLE TO THE ABOVE NAMED PROVIDER AND CONTRACTOR JOINTLY.”

Click to view form.

History.

Acts 1979, No. 746, §§ 1-5; 1981, No. 669, § 1; 1983, No. 304, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-608.1 — 51-608.6; Acts 1995, No. 1298, § 7; 2005, No. 1994, § 98; 2005, No. 2287, § 3; 2009, No. 454, § 3; 2011, No. 271, § 5; 2017, No. 808, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment by No. 1994 substituted “violation and upon conviction” for “misdemeanor and” in (e)(3).

The 2005 amendment by No. 2287 redesignated former (e)(2)(B) as present (e)(2)(B)(i); in present (e)(2)(B)(i), substituted “The” for “This” and deleted “by registered mail, return receipt requested” following “contractor” and added (e)(2)(B)(ii).

The 2009 amendment rewrote the section.

The 2011 amendment substituted “suppliers” for “supplies” in (a)(5)(B)(i).

The 2017 amendment added (a)(8)(B)(ii); and made stylistic changes.

18-44-116. Service on nonresident or absconder.

(a)(1)

Whenever property is sought to be charged with a lien under this subchapter, the notice may be filed with the recorder of deeds of the county in which the property is situated if the owner of the property so sought to be charged:

(A)

Is not a resident of this state;

(B)

Does not have an agent in the county in which the property is situated;

(C)

Is a resident of this state but not of the county in which the property is situated; or

(D)

Conceals himself or herself, has absconded, or absents himself or herself from his or her usual place of abode, so that the notice required by §18-44-114 or §18-44-115 cannot be served upon him or her.

(2)

When filed, the notice shall have like effect as if served upon the owner or his or her agent in the manner contemplated in §18-44-114 or §18-44-115.

(b)

A copy of the notice so filed, together with the certificate of the recorder of deeds that it is a correct copy of the notice so filed, shall be received in all courts of this state as evidence of the service, as provided in this section, of the notice.

(c)(1)

The recorder of deeds in each county of this state shall receive, file, and keep every such notice presented to him or her for filing and shall further record it at length in a separate book appropriately entitled.

(2)

For service so performed, the recorder of deeds shall receive for each notice, the sum of twenty-five cents (25¢), and for each copy certified, as stated in this section, of each of the notices he or she shall receive the sum of fifty cents (50¢), to be paid by the party so filing or procuring the certified copy, as the case may be.

(d)

The costs of filing and of one (1) certified copy shall be taxed as costs in any lien suit to which it pertains to abide the result of the suit.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, § 7, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., § 6918; Pope's Dig., § 8877; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-609; Acts 2009, No. 454, § 3.

Amendments.

The 2009 amendment inserted “or §18-44-115” in (a)(1)(D) and (a)(2); and made a minor stylistic change.

18-44-117. Filing of lien.

(a)(1)

A person who wishes to avail himself or herself of the provisions of this subchapter has a duty to file with the clerk of the circuit court of the county in which the building, erection, or other improvement to be charged with the lien is situated and within one hundred twenty (120) days after the things specified in this subchapter have been furnished or the work or labor done or performed:

(A)

A just and true account of the demand due or owing to him or her after allowing all credits; and

(B)

An affidavit of notice attached to the lien account.

(2)(A)

The lien account shall contain a correct description of the property to be charged with the lien, verified by affidavit.

(B)

For real property, a street address is not a correct description of the property under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section.

(3)

The affidavit of notice shall contain:

(A)

A sworn statement evidencing compliance with the applicable notice provisions of §§18-44-114 —18-44-116;

(B)

A copy of each applicable notice given under §§18-44-114 —18-44-116; and

(C)

A copy of the proof of service required under §18-44-114.

(b)(1)(A)

The clerk of the circuit court has a duty to endorse upon every account the date of its filing and to make an abstract of the account in a book kept by him or her for that purpose, properly indexed.

(B)

This abstract shall contain:

(i)

The date of the filing;

(ii)

The name of the person laying or imposing the lien;

(iii)

The amount of the lien;

(iv)

The name of the person against whose property the lien is filed; and

(v)

A description of the property to be charged with the lien.

(C)

For real property, a street address is not a sufficient description under subdivision (b)(1)(B) of this section.

(2)

For this service, the person laying or imposing the lien shall submit the fee required by §21-6-306 to the clerk of the circuit court, and the fee shall be taxed and collected as other costs in case there is a suit on the lien.

(3)

The clerk of the circuit court shall not file a lien account that does not contain the affidavits and attachments required by this section.

History.

Acts 1895, No. 146, §§ 11, 12, p. 217; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6922, 6923; Pope's Dig., §§ 8881, 8882; Acts 1945, No. 55, § 2; 1961, No. 239, § 1; 1963, No. 124, § 1; 1977, No. 333, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-1720, 51-613, 51-614; Acts 2005, No. 2287, § 1; 2007, No. 810, § 1; 2009, No. 454, § 3; 2019, No. 806, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “The” for “This” in (a)(2).

The 2009 amendment deleted “account — Abstract” at the end of the section heading; and inserted “applicable” in (a)(3)(A) and (a)(3)(b).

The 2019 amendment redesignated (a)(2) as (a)(2)(A) and added (a)(2)(B); added (a)(3)(C); added (b)(1)(C); rewrote (b)(2); substituted “clerk of the circuit court shall not” for “clerk shall refuse to” in (b)(3); and made stylistic changes.

Cross References.

Uniform fees for recorders, §§16-65-117,21-6-101.